Massachusetts, session 194th, S1375.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 175M of the General Laws is hereby amended by
removing the words “6 month” in subsection (c) and replacing it with the words “3 months”.
SECTION 2. Section 9 of chapter 175M of the General Laws is hereby amended by
removing the word “presumed” in subsection (c).
SECTION 3. Section 9 of chapter 175M of the General Laws is hereby amended by
removing the following words in subsection (c). “Such presumption shall be rebutted only by
clear and convincing evidence that such employer's action was not retaliation against the
employee and that the employer had sufficient independent justification for taking such action
and would have in fact taken such action in the same manner and at the same time the action was
taken, regardless of the employee's use of leave, restoration to a position or participation in
proceedings or inquiries as described in this subsection.”
of 1